Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-420
Fresh pursuit, defined.

For purposes of the Uniform Act on Fresh Pursuit, the term fresh pursuit shall include fresh pursuit as defined by the common law and also the pursuit of a person who has committed a felony or who is reasonably suspected of having committed a felony. It shall also include the pursuit of a person suspected of having committed a supposed felony, though no felony has actually been committed, if there is reasonable ground for believing that a felony has been committed. Fresh pursuit shall not necessarily imply instant pursuit, but pursuit without unreasonable delay.

Laws 1937, c. 70, § 5, p. 256;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 29-420;

R.S.1943, § 29-420;

Laws 2001, LB 299, § 3.

In order for search to be valid in connection with fresh pursuit, felony must have been committed in another state. State v. Goff, 174 Neb. 548, 118 N.W.2d 625 (1962).